Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 3. Crossing or Connecting with Another Railroad

§ 3612.
Railroads may cross or unite; compensation, points and manner.

A railroad corporation may cross or unite its railroad with any other railroad at any point in its route and upon the grounds of such other railroad corporation, with necessary turnouts, sidings, switches, and other conveniences. If the two corporations cannot agree upon the amount of compensation to be made or the points and manner of such crossings and connections, the same shall be determined by the Transportation Board on petition, service, and hearing.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 56;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3613.
Foreign corporations may hold real estate, when.

A foreign railroad corporation connecting at the line of this State with a domestic railroad corporation may acquire and hold in this State such real estate as it may find necessary, and may make such improvements thereon as shall enable it satisfactorily, to make such connection with the railroad in this State, and may construct and maintain all necessary sidings, engine houses, car houses, turntables, and other necessary structures and appliances for terminal purposes as shall be required for the operation of its railroad.

§ 3614.
Terms of business between connecting roads.

When a railroad enters upon, intersects, or connects with another railroad, the managers of each of such connecting roads shall furnish to the other reasonable terms of connection, accommodations, privileges, and facilities, in the reception, transportation, and delivery of cars, passengers, baggage, and freight, to and from each of such connecting roads, according to the usual course of railroad business, including the sale and reception of passenger tickets and checking of baggage, and shall receive and transport such cars, passengers, baggage, and freight at reasonable times, and on reasonable terms.

§ 3615.
Terms with two competing roads that intersect.

When a railroad is intersected by two or more railroads that are competing lines for business to or from the road so intersected, the managers of the road shall transport cars, passengers, baggage, and freight to and from each of the intersecting roads on the same terms, and shall not establish rules, regulations, or terms of connection that will give to either of the competing roads an unreasonable advantage over the other. If the managers of the roads cannot agree upon any of the terms, the same, on petition, notice, and hearing, shall be determined by the Transportation Board.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 57;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3616.
Connection of passenger trains; Board may determine.

The Board may determine the time or times when the passenger trains of connecting railroads shall connect with each other, having in view the convenience of the traveling public, and may make all necessary rules respecting the manner of such connections. Such determination and order may be made on petition of either of the connecting roads, or of twenty or more freeholders of the vicinity, duly served and heard. The Board, at any time, may change its order, on petition, service of petition, and hearing.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 38, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 3617.
Making competing road a party.

A competing road interested in the time or times of such connections, or in the rules and regulations governing the same, may be made a party to such petition and hearing, or may bring an independent petition to have the time, times, rules, or regulations changed or modified. The Board, on due service and hearing, may make such changes or modifications as are required for the accommodation, convenience, and safety of the public.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 3618.
Intersection of railroads; stopping trains.

All trains or engines run upon a railroad in this State which intersects or crosses or is intersected or crossed by another railroad upon the same level, shall be brought to a full stop and the whistle sounded at a distance of not less than 100 feet nor more than 1,000 feet from the point of intersection or crossing, before such intersection or crossing is passed by such train or engine. The full stop and crossing on signal, with the approval of the Transportation Board, may be discontinued if an interlocking switch and signal apparatus is adopted, installed, and put in operation by such railroads at such crossing or intersection of two railroads.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 58.

§ 3619.
Penalty.

An engineer who violates a provision of section 3618 of this title shall be fined $100.00, and the corporation on whose road the offense is committed shall be fined the further sum of $300.00.